Utah statutes.
26-41-106.   Immunity from liability.
(1)  A qualified adult who acts in good faith is not liable in any civil or
criminal action for any act taken or not taken under the authority of this
chapter with respect to an anaphylactic reaction.
(2)  Section 53A-11-601 does not apply to the administration of an epinephrine
auto-injector in accordance with this chapter.
